test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_bimisewanakid_gt-norm.yaml
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: bimisewanakidenhimishiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: bimisewanakidensimishan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: bimisewanakidensimishag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: bimisewanakidensimishing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimishan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimishag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidensiminaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidensiminaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidensimiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidensiminiiban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidensimini***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidenhiminaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidenhimiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidenhiminiiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidensiminaanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidensiminaanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidensiminaaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensimiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensimiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensimiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidensiminian
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidensiminiag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidensiminiing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiminaanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiminaanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiminaaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiminian
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiminiag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensimibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensimibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensimibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensim***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensim***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensim***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhim***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhim***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidensishinaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidensishinaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidensishiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidensishiniiban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidensishini***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidenhishinaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidenhishiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidenhishiniiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidensishinaanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidensishinaanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidensishinaaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensishiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensishiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensishiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidensishinian
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidensishiniag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidensishiniing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishinaanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishinaanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishinaaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishinian
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishiniag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensishibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensishibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensishibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensish***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensish***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensish***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhish***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhish***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensinaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensinaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensinaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensinaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensiniibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensiniibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensiniibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensini***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensini***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensini***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhinaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhinaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhinaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiniibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiniibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiniibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhini***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhini***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidimishinaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidimishinaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidimishiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidimishiniiban
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidimishinaanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidimishinaanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidimishinaaning
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidimishiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidimishiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidimishiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidimishinian
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidimishiniag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidimishibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidimishibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidimishibaning
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidimish***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidimish***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidiminaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidiminaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidiminaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidiminaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidimiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidimiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidimiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidiminiibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidiminiibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidiminiibaning
